Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 2. Powers of Guardians

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Guardian and Ward §§ 93 to 185.

39 C.J.S. Guardian and Ward §§ 51 to 251.

§ 3-2-201.
Powers and duties of guardian.

The guardian shall:

Determine and facilitate the least restrictive and most appropriate and available residence for the ward;

Facilitate the ward’s education, social and other activities;

Subject to the restrictions of W.S.

3-2-202

, authorize or expressly withhold authorization of medical or other professional care, treatment or advice;

Take reasonable care of the ward’s personal property;

Commence protective proceedings if necessary to protect the property of the ward;

Apply to the ward’s current needs for support, care and education as much of the money or property paid or delivered to the guardian pursuant to W.S.

3-3-108

as may be appropriate;

Exercise due care to conserve excess funds for the ward’s future needs;

Pay to the conservator excess funds at least annually;

Request the court to modify the guardian’s range of duties if the changed circumstances of the ward require such modification; and

Following the death of a ward, arrange for the final disposition of the ward’s remains according to the ward’s expressed wishes if known, if the immediate family is unavailable or unwilling to assume responsibility. For purposes of this paragraph, “immediate family” is defined as parents, spouse, grandparents, siblings and adult children.

The guardian may:

Receive money payable from any conservatorship for the support of the ward;

Receive money or property of the ward paid or delivered to the guardian pursuant to W.S.

3-3-108

;

Institute proceedings to compel the performance by any person of the duty to support or contribute to the support of the ward;

and (v) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 3.

Consent to the marriage or adoption of the ward.

The guardian is not liable for injury to the ward resulting from the negligence or acts of third persons performed by authority given by the guardian for medical or other professional care, treatment or advice, unless it would have been negligent for a parent to have given that authority.

Funds received by the guardian pursuant to W.S.

3-3-108

shall not be used for compensation for the services of the guardian unless approved as required under W.S.

3-2-111

.

The guardian of a minor has the powers and responsibilities of a parent who has not been deprived of custody of his unemancipated minor child. A guardian who is not a parent of the minor is not obligated to expend his own funds for the support of the ward. A guardian who is not the parent of a minor is not liable to third persons for acts of the ward by reason of the relationship of guardian and ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring consent of guardian to adoption of child, see §

1-22-109

.

As to duties of guardian in connection with quieting title, ejectment and rights of occupying claimants, see §§

1-32-213

to

1-32-216

.

As to necessity of parents' or guardians' consent to minor's marriage, see §

20-1-102

.

For right of minor parent to bring suit in actions under Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see §

20-4-152

.

As to rights of guardian in gift to minor ward, see §

34-13-126

.

As to actions by and against guardians, see Rule 17, W.R.C.P.

Repairs without court order permissive. —

A guardian has authority to expend money for repairs in protection of the estate, without an order of the court. Nagle v. Robins, 9 Wyo. 211, 62 P. 154,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1900) (decided prior to 1985 revision).

Maternal grandmother was not judicially estopped from seeking termination of father's parental rights

merely because the parties had already entered into a guardianship and custody agreement. The grandmother never took inconsistent positions in separate judicial proceedings. In the guardianship proceedings, she alleged that she was the proper person to have custody of the child and, in furtherance of such interest, she sought the termination of parental rights. In re Parental Rights to ARW, 716 P.2d 353,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1986), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(2006); DJM v. DM (In re SRB-M), 2009 WY 22, 201 P.3d 1115,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Feb. 20, 2009).

Applied

in

Kaiser v. Farnsworth Drilling, Co., 851 P.2d 1292,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of guardian of incompetent to change beneficiaries in ward's life insurance policy, 21 ALR2d 1191.

Liability of incompetent's estate for torts committed by guardian, committee or trustee in managing estate, 40 ALR2d 1103.

Right of foreign personal representative or guardian to vote stock owned by estate or ward, 41 ALR2d 1082.

Guardian's authority to make agreement to drop or compromise will contest or withdraw objection to probate, 42 A.L.R.2d 1319.

Power of court to confirm sale of ward's property over objection of guardian, 43 ALR2d 1445.

Right of guardian to retain unauthorized securities coming into his hands, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Ademption or revocation of specific devise or bequest by guardian, committee or conservator of mentally or physically incompetent testator, 51 ALR2d 770.

Power of guardian, committee or trustee of mental incompetent, after latter's death, to pay debts and obligations, 60 ALR2d 963.

Rights and powers of guardian with reference to joint bank deposits in name of incompetent and another, 62 A.L.R.2d 1091.

Guardian's liability for interest on ward's funds, 72 ALR2d 757.

Capacity of guardian to sue or to be sued outside state where appointed, 94 ALR2d 162.

Power to make charitable gifts from estate of incompetent, 99 ALR2d 946.

Power to lease infant's land beyond minority or guardianship, 6 ALR3d 570.

Power of court or guardian to make noncharitable gifts or allowances out of funds of incompetent ward, 24 ALR3d 863.

Power of parent, guardian or committee to consent to surgical invasion of ward's person for benefit of another, 35 ALR3d 692.

Guardian's position as joint tenant of or successor to property in ward's estate as raising conflict of interest, 69 ALR3d 1198.

Judgment in guardian's final accounting proceedings as res judicata in ward's subsequent action against guardian, 34 ALR4th 1121.

Guardian's authority, without seeking court approval, to exercise ward's right to revoke trust, 53 ALR4th 1297.

Validity of inter vivos gift by ward to guardian or conservator, 70 ALR4th 499.

Liability of guardian ad litem for infant party to civil suit for negligence in connection with suit, 14 ALR5th 929.

§ 3-2-202.
Powers of the guardian subject to approval of the court.

Upon order of the court, after notice and hearing and appointment of a guardian ad litem, the guardian may:

Commit the ward to a mental health hospital or other mental health facility;

Consent to the following treatments for the ward:

Electroshock therapy;

Psychosurgery;

Sterilization;

Other long-term or permanent contraception.

Relinquish the ward’s minor child for adoption, provided:

Notice of any hearing was given to the ward and the legal or putative father; and

The ward attended the hearing if the court so ordered.

Execute any appropriate advance medical directives, including durable power of attorney for health care under W.S. 35-22-403(b) and an individual instruction under W.S. 35-22-403(a).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 1; 2005, ch. 161, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(iv), substituted “W.S. 35-22-403(b) and an individual instruction under W.S. 35-22-403(a)” for “W.S.

3-5-201

et seq. and living will under W.S.

35-22-101

et seq.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).